Massachusetts, session 194th, S333.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish a written policy
prohibiting the use of wireless communication devices in K-12 public schools by students during
the school day unless authorized by a principal. The policy shall include:
(a) one or more secure, designated areas where students may store their cellular
telephones during the school day, which may include student lockers.
(b) one or more methods for parents and guardians of students to readily contact students
during the school day and provide for written notification of parents and guardians of these
methods at the beginning of each school year.
(c) The department of elementary and secondary education regulations shall provide for
medical exceptions and other appropriate exigencies.
of 1